South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-130 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (I) Notwithstanding another provision of law, alimony may be awarded only to the party who has lesser income, and alimony awarded on a temporary or permanent basis may not exceed an annual amount equal to the difference between the higher wage earner's annual wages and the lower wage earner's annual wages multiplied by seventeen percent. Further, alimony payments may not be awarded for more months than the parties were married. However, if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the award of alimony pursuant to this formula is inequitable, the court may allow a deviation, including upward modification in amount and duration and an award to the higher earning spouse. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----